Texas statutes.
BUSINESS AND COMMERCE CODE

TITLE 5. REGULATION OF BUSINESSES AND SERVICES

SUBTITLE C. BUSINESS OPERATIONS

CHAPTER 108. CERTAIN CHARGES OR SECURITY DEPOSITS FOR CANINE HANDLERS PROHIBITED

Sec. 108.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Canine unit" means a canine handler who is a peace officer or firefighter and a service canine trained to assist a peace officer or firefighter in the performance of the individual's official duties.

(2) "Commercial lodging establishment" means a hotel, motel, inn, or similar entity that offers lodging to the public in exchange for compensation.

(3) "Declared disaster" means:

(A) a disaster declared by the president of the United States;

(B) a state of disaster declared by the governor under Chapter 418, Government Code; or

(C) a local state of disaster declared by the governing body of a political subdivision under Section 418.108, Government Code.

(4) "Firefighter" means an individual who is defined as fire protection personnel under Section 419.021, Government Code.

(5) "Mutual aid" has the meaning assigned by Section 418.004, Government Code.

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(6) "Peace officer" means a person elected, employed, or appointed as a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(6) "Peace officer" means a person elected, employed, or appointed as a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure, or other law.

(7) "Service canine" means a canine trained to assist in search and rescue or law enforcement activities.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 579 (H.B. 3487), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Business and Commerce Code, Chapter 106 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(4), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.004, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 108.002. CERTAIN CHARGES OR SECURITY DEPOSITS PROHIBITED. A commercial lodging establishment or restaurant may not require the payment of an extra fee or charge or a security deposit for a service canine that accompanies an individual to the establishment or restaurant if:

(1) the individual is:

(A) a peace officer or firefighter assigned to a canine unit; or

(B) a handler of a search and rescue canine participating in a search and rescue operation under the authority or direction of a law enforcement agency or search and rescue agency; and

(2) the individual is away from the individual's home jurisdiction while in the course and scope of duty because of:

(A) a declared disaster; or

(B) a mutual aid request or mutual aid training.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 579 (H.B. 3487), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Business and Commerce Code, Chapter 106 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(4), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 108.003. LIABILITY FOR PROPERTY DAMAGES. (a) Governmental immunity from suit and from liability is waived and the department or agency of a canine unit may be held liable to the owner or operator of a commercial lodging establishment or restaurant for any damages to the premises caused by the service canine.

(b) The handler of a search and rescue canine is liable to the owner or operator of a commercial lodging establishment or restaurant for any damages to the premises caused by the service canine.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 579 (H.B. 3487), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Business and Commerce Code, Chapter 106 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(4), eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 108.004. CIVIL PENALTY. The owner or operator of a commercial lodging establishment or restaurant that violates Section 108.002 is liable for a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed $200 for each violation.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 579 (H.B. 3487), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Redesignated from Business and Commerce Code, Chapter 106 by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.001(4), eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 22.002(3), eff. September 1, 2013.